Utah statutes.
59-7-110.   Utah net losses -- Carryforwards and carrybacks -- Deduction.
(1)  The amount of Utah net loss which shall be carried back or forward to
offset income of another taxable year shall be determined as provided in this
section.
(2) (a)  A Utah net loss from a taxable year beginning before January 1, 1994,
shall be carried back three taxable years preceding the taxable year of the
loss and any remaining loss shall be carried forward five taxable years
following the taxable year of the loss, subject to the limitations of this
section.
(b)  A Utah net loss from a taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
1994, may be carried back three taxable years preceding the taxable year of
the loss and carried forward 15 taxable years following the taxable year of
the loss, subject to the limitations of this section.  If an election is made
to forego the federal net operating loss carryback, the Utah net loss is not
eligible to be carried back unless an election is made for state purposes.
(3)  The Utah net loss shall be carried to the earliest eligible year for
which the Utah taxable income before net loss deduction, minus Utah net losses
from previous years which were applied or required to be applied to offset
income, is not less than zero.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(a)(iii), the amount of Utah net
loss which shall be carried to the year identified in Subsection (3) shall be
the lesser of:
(i)  the remaining Utah net loss after deduction of any amounts of such loss
which were carried to previous years; or
(ii)  the remaining Utah taxable income before net loss deduction of the year
identified in Subsection (3) after deduction of Utah net losses from previous
years which were carried or required to be carried to such year; and
(iii)  in any event, the amount carried back from a taxable year beginning on
or after January 1, 1994, may not exceed $1,000,000 in Utah taxable income for
each corporate return filed in a taxable year; any losses in excess of
$1,000,000 may be carried forward; and
(b)  any remaining Utah net loss shall be available to be carried to one or
more taxable years in accordance with this section.
(5) (a)  Corporations acquiring the assets or stock of another corporation may
not deduct any net loss incurred by the acquired corporation prior to the date
of acquisition.  This subsection does not apply if the only change in the
corporation is that of the state of incorporation.
(b)  An acquired corporation may deduct its net losses incurred before the
date of acquisition against its separate income as calculated under Subsection
(6) if the acquired corporation has continued to carry on a trade or business
substantially the same as that conducted before such acquisition.
(6)  For purposes of Subsection (5)(b), the amount of net loss an acquired
corporation that is acquired by a unitary group may deduct is calculated by:
(a)  subject to Subsection (7), calculating the sum of:
(i)  an amount determined by dividing the average value of the acquired
corporation's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used in
this state during the taxable year by the average value of all of the unitary
group's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used during
the taxable year;
(ii)  an amount determined by dividing the total amount paid in this state
during the taxable year by the acquired corporation for compensation by the
total compensation paid everywhere by the unitary group during the taxable
year; and
(iii)  an amount determined by:
(A)  dividing the total sales of the acquired corporation in this state during
the taxable year by the total sales of the unitary group everywhere during the
taxable year; and
(B)  if the unitary group elects to apportion business income to this state
using the method described in Subsection 59-7-311(2)(b), multiplying the
amount calculated under Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(A) by two;
(b)  dividing the amount calculated under Subsection (6)(a) by the denominator
of the fraction for the unitary group to apportion business income to this
state using the same election for calculating that denominator that the
unitary group uses:
(i)  for that taxable year; and
(ii)  in accordance with Section 59-7-311;
(c)  multiplying the amount calculated under Subsection (6)(b) by the business
income of the unitary group for the taxable year that is subject to
apportionment under Section 59-7-311; and
(d)  calculating the sum of:
(i)  the amount calculated under Subsection (6)(c); and
(ii)  the following amounts allocable to the acquired corporation for the
taxable year:
(A)  nonbusiness income allocable to this state; or
(B)  nonbusiness loss allocable to this state.
(7)  The amounts calculated under Subsection (6)(a) shall be derived in the
same manner as those amounts are derived for purposes of apportioning the
unitary group's business income before deducting the net loss, including a
modification made in accordance with Section 59-7-320.
